Georgia, session 2025_26, SB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to distribution,
storage, and the sale of gas, is amended by revising Code Section 46-4-164, relating to
construction of article, electric membership corporations and EMC gas affiliates, disclosure
requirements, and liquefied petroleum gas, as follows:
"46-4-164.
(a) Nothing in this article shall be deemed to apply or impose requirements not otherwise
existing on gas distribution companies owned by any county, municipality, other political
subdivision, or governmental authority of this state; nor are the provisions of this article
intended to increase or decrease the authority and jurisdiction of the commission with
respect to the distribution, sale, or transportation of gas by any county, municipality, other
S. B. 256
- 1 -

LC 55 0571S (SCS)
political subdivision, or governmental authority of this state. Nothing in this article shall
be construed to limit or otherwise affect the existing powers of municipal corporations or
other political subdivisions of this state relating to the granting of franchises or the levying
or imposition of taxes, fees, or charges.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including, without limitation,
Article 4 of Chapter 3 of this title, an electric membership corporation may make and
maintain investments in, lend funds to, and guarantee the debts and obligations of an EMC
gas affiliate in total not to exceed 25 percent of such electric membership corporation's net
utility plant, excluding electric generation and transmission assets as defined by the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform System of Accounts in effect at the time of such
investment, loan, or guarantee, provided that any such investments or loans shall not reflect
rates which are generally available through the use of any tax exempt financing and may
not be tied to any loans from or guaranteed by the federal or state government; and an EMC
gas affiliate of an electric membership corporation organized and operating pursuant to
Article 4 of Chapter 3 of this title may apply for and be granted a certificate of authority
to provide any service as authorized under this article. The creation, capitalization, or
provision of management for:
(1) An EMC gas affiliate engaged in activities subject to the provisions of this article and
the rules and regulations established by the commission; or
(2) Other persons providing customer services
shall be deemed to be among the purposes of an electric membership corporation as
specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of Code Section 46-3-200. Nothing in this article shall
be deemed to increase or decrease the authority and jurisdiction of the commission with
respect to such electric membership corporation except as to gas activities undertaken by
the electric membership corporation or its EMC gas affiliate as authorized under this
chapter.
S. B. 256
- 2 -

LC 55 0571S (SCS)
(c) Within six months following any transaction that causes an electric membership
corporation to have more than 15 percent of its net utility plant invested in, lent to, or
secured for the benefit of its EMC gas affiliate, excluding electric generation and
transmission assets as defined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform
System of Accounts, such electric membership corporation shall disclose to its members:
(1) A description of the assets or interests acquired in the transaction;
(2) The date of such transaction;
(3) The identification A description of any assets pledged by the electric membership
corporation to secure a loan or other funding in connection with such transaction that
forms all or a portion of the assets pledged to secure such loan or other funding;
(4) The total amount of the electric membership corporation's assets, debts, and
obligations, and those of the EMC gas affiliate; and
(5) The total amount of the electric membership corporation's electric generation and
transmission assets as defined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform
System of Accounts; and
(6) The percentage of the electric membership corporation's net utility plant used for the
purposes described in subsection (b) of this Code section.
(d) An electric membership corporation that has more than 15 percent net utility plant
invested in, lent to, or secured for the benefit of its EMC gas affiliate, excluding electric
generation and transmission assets as defined by the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission Uniform System of Accounts, shall disclose to its members the annual cost
of gas in aggregate that it sells. Such disclosure shall be made on an annual basis.
(e) Nothing in this article shall be construed to allow or authorize an electing distribution
company, a certificated marketer, or a regulated provider of natural gas to engage in the
production, transportation, marketing, or distribution of liquefied petroleum gas; provided,
however, that nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit an electing distribution
S. B. 256
- 3 -

LC 55 0571S (SCS)
company from using liquefied petroleum gas to provide for system balancing and peaking
services for its distribution system."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 256
- 4 -